New Jersey, session 222, A2916.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Board of Public Utilities shall not approve the request of a public utility, as defined in R.S.48:2-13, to recover administrative costs through the public utility rates charged to ratepayers after the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, administrative costs means any payment made by a public utility in furtherance of utility service that is not recovered by the public utility as a capital expense.  Administrative costs includes, but is not limited to, the cost of personnel salaries, information technology, office supplies, and legal expenses. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.